Hawaii statutes.
§157-14 Inspection and investigation.
For the purpose of enforcing this chapter, including but not limited to the
provisions on licensing, setting of minimum prices and quotas, the board of
agriculture or any of its authorized employees may enter at all reasonable
hours all places within the State where milk is being produced, sold, stored,
processed, or containerized, or where the books, papers, records, or documents
relating to such transactions are kept, and shall have power to inspect and
copy the same. It may administer oaths and take testimony for the purpose of
ascertaining facts which in its judgment are necessary to administer this
chapter. [L 1967, c 260, §7; HRS §157-14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next